Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,103
School or apprentice salon; operation; student; apprentice; student instructor; requirements.

In order to maintain a school or apprentice salon license in good standing, each school or apprentice salon shall operate in accordance with the following:

(1) Every person accepted for enrollment as a standard student or apprentice shall show evidence that he or she attained the age of seventeen years on or before the date of his or her enrollment in a school of cosmetology, a school of esthetics, or an apprentice salon, has completed the equivalent of a high school education, has been accepted for enrollment at a school of cosmetology, a school of esthetics, or an apprentice salon, and has not undertaken any training in cosmetology or esthetics without being enrolled as a student or apprentice;

(2)(a) Every person accepted for enrollment as a special study student or apprentice shall show evidence that he or she:

(i) Has attained the age of seventeen years on or before the date of enrollment in a school of cosmetology, a school of esthetics, or an apprentice salon;

(ii) Has completed the tenth grade;

(iii) Has been accepted for enrollment at a school of cosmetology, a school of esthetics, or an apprentice salon; and

(iv) Is actively continuing his or her formal high school education on a full-time basis as determined by the department.

(b) An applicant for enrollment as a special study student or apprentice shall not have undertaken any training in cosmetology or esthetics without being enrolled as a student or apprentice.

(c) Special study students shall be limited to attending a school of cosmetology, a school of esthetics, or an apprentice salon for no more than eight hours per week during the school year;

(3) Every person accepted for enrollment as a student instructor shall show evidence of current licensure as a cosmetologist or esthetician in Nebraska and completion of formal education equivalent to a United States high school education; and

(4) No school of cosmetology, school of esthetics, or apprentice salon shall accept an individual for enrollment who does not provide evidence of meeting the age and education requirements.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 63;

Laws 1987, LB 543, § 11;

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 31;

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 26;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 28;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-3,102;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 365;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 30.